ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/da_DK/hyph_da_DK.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.a2
.a2b1s
.al1v
.a2n1s
.af3l
.au2
.be1la
.1be
.e2
.el3se
.e2l1s
.en1so
.e2ns
.en1sp
.eta3p
.ek2s1t
.d2
.de2r
.1de
.du2a
.1du
.lå1r
.li1er
.lin3dr
.li2nd
.lu1tr
.å2
.ned1r
.1ne
.ny1a
.nø1je
.reli1gi3
.re1li
.retnin4
.1r2et1n
.ret1ni
.retning3er
.retni2ng
.retnin1ge
.rø3ge
.rø2g
.t2
.te1o1
.teo1re3
.trai3
.ti1e
.ti2l1
.tydnin3
.1tyd
.tyd1n
.tyd3ni
.i2
.in1gr
.i2ng
.i2n1s
.i1s1te
.is1k
.im1p
.g2
.s2
.så1re
.2sår
.stru2e
.so1ve
.2skam1
.sce1n
.sø1e
.1sø
.o2
.om1
.om3s
.o1p1æ
.ove2
.over1
.y2
.ma2l2e.
.1ma
.ma1le
.ma1sk
.me1ne2
.1me
.me2ned
.k2
.kå1
.ko1v
.p2
.pub1l
.frank3
.forenin4ger
.for1e2n
.for1e2ni
.foreni2ng
.forenin1ge
.føren2
.fø1re
.føre3n1de
.føre2nd
.ful2
.1fu
.fu3g4le2n.
.fug1le
.æ2
.æl1dr
.æn1
.ø2
.ø1de1
.øl1
.v2
.ve2f1
.vo1ve
.2vov
.u2
.ua2
.ud1s2
.un1dr
.u2nd
.u2s2m
2a.
aa2
a1ad
a1an
a1af
ab1le
ab2l2e.
a1br
ab1st
a2bs
a1bu1
a1e
ae1le
a2es
ad1r2e.
ad1red
ad1rer
ad1ret
a3di
ad1sa
ad1st
ad1skæ
ad1s2p
ad1su
a1dor
ad1øl
ad1j
a1l2a.
a1la1e
al1a2ng
a1la2g
al1a2m
a1lak
al1au
1al1bu
al1b
a1le
a2l1eu
al2dra
ald1re
ald3rin
al1tr
alt1ov
a1li
ali1a
al1i2nd
2alg
al1gu
al2stø
a2l1s
al2sp
al3spo
a1lo
a2lor
a1ly
al1ps
a1læ1
alv1is
al1vo
al1ud
al1ul
an1al1f
a1nat
ana1to
ane1d
a1ne
an1er1k
an2d1ej
a2nd
an1de
an1dr
1anno
an1n
anti1e
a2nt
an1ti
ani1el
a1ni
a3nie
ani3o
1an1gi
a2ng
ang1so2
an2gs
an2gæ
an1så
a2ns
an1st
an1s1mæ
an1sc
ans1p
1an1sø
an1sv
1an1me
a2n1m
an1kl
ank1re
an2ceu
an1c
an1æ2r
a1nø
a1nu1
a2n1ud
a1ra
a1re
are1ta
are1i
a3reg
ar2les
ar1l2
a1rå
ar3r
a3ri
ar1gr
ar4sa
a1ry
ar1kn2
1arkt
a1rø
a1ru
a1ta
ata1b
ata1g
a1te
at1ej
a1tr
at1ra
a1ti
ati2e
ati3er
at2sam
a2ts
ats1l2
ats1t
a1tor
a1tos
at2om
ato1v
at1ho
at1v
a1tu
at1ug
at1j
ai2les
ai1le
a1i2nd
a1it
ai2se
ai3ske
a1ik
a1iv
aga3s
a1ga
a2g1af
ag1la
ag1lo
ag1ly
ag1læ
ag1na
ag1no1
ag1re
ag1ri
ag1ta
ag3si
a2gs
ag1om
ag1y2
ag1ud
ase1s
a1se
a1sla
asl2
a1slev
as1lå
as1lu
a1sti
a1sto
asi1er
a1si
aso1ci1
as1ov
as1m
as1kan
a1sk2r
as1pl
as1pr
as1v
a1su
a3ob
a1or
a1ot
a1o2s.
ao1sm
a1op
a1ov
a1ha
a1he
a1ho
2am1l
am1st
am1ov
a1mo
a1mø3
am1ud
ak1ar
a1ke
a3ked
a1kra
a3kre1re
akti2en
ak1ti
a1ki
a1ko
a1kø
ak1væ
a1k1j
a1ca
a1ce
a1co
a1pa
ap1ad
a1pe
a2p2e.
a1pe2s
ap1la
ap1re
a1pi
api2ri
a1py
ap1h
a1pu
a1p1ud
ap1j
1a2f1d
af1l
af1re
af1ru
1af1tr
a2ft
a1fo
a1æ
aæn1
a1ve
av1r
a1vie
a1vig
av1sa
a2vs
av1s2l2
av1sp
a1vo1
a2v1o2v
a1væ
au2b
au1e
au1n
au1r
au1kr
au2c
a1ja
a1je
a1je1s
a1xi1
a1xo1
a1w
2b.
1ba
ba1la
ba1na
ba1no
ba1re2
baret1
bars2
bar1sl2
ba1ro
ba1t1i
bat1o1
ba2g3e2nd
ba1ge
bag1r
ba2g1s2
ba1sa
ba1sta
bak1
2b1b
1be
be1e2
be1då
be3driv
be1las
be1le
bel2ta
be1lo
belo2v
be1nå
be3ni
be1ny
b2e1ra
be1r1or
be1ry
be1ru
be1ta
be1ti
be1t1v
be1g
be1s2
be3su2
be1k
be1v
be1ve3
be1je
b1d
b2la
b1les
blem1s
b1li1c
bå1re
2b1n
1bri
bri1e
b1te
1bi
bi1an
bi1e
bi1dr
bid1s
bi1ro
bi3gå
bi1st
bi1sp
bi2o
bi3os
2bs
b1sal
bs1an
bs1ar
bs1le
bsl2
bs1li
bs1lo
bs1å
b1sol
bs1h
bs1m
bs1ku
bs1kj
bs1c
bs1p
bs1v
b1su
bob1l
b2ob
bo3el
bo1e
1bol
bo1ra
bo1re
bor2tr
bo1ri
bo1rø
bo1ru
1bot
bo2ga
bo2gr
bo1st
bo1sk
bom1
bo1p2
1by
by1dr
by1tr
bygnin4
byg1ni
bygning3e2r.
bygni2ng
bygnin1ge
by1sl2
2b1h
b1m
b1k
b1f
1bø
bø1je
b1v
1bu
bu1e2n
bu1la
bul1d
bu1ra
bu1re
bu1ri
bu1t
bu2t1r
bu1ke
b1w
2e.
e1al
ea1la
e3ald
e1an
ea2n1g
e1a2r1b
e1art
e1at
e1ag
ea2m1
e1ak
e1ap
e1af1
e1av
e1b
ebi3o
e1bi
e2bs1
ee2
e1e2e2
ee3der
ee1de
ee3la
e1el1l
e1elt
ee3li
e1e2n1h
e1er
ee3re
e1et
e1eg
e1em
eek1e
e1ev
e1ej
e1dal
e1dam
ede1s1i
e1de
e2d1ej
ed1re
ed1rin
e2d1rig
e1drif
ed1ry
e1dru
ed1tj
ed1id
e1di
e2din
ed1sla
edsl2
ed1sta
ed1sy
ed1or
ed1op
e1dø
edø1v
e3du
ed1j
e1lad
el1al
e1l1ar
e1lav
e1ler
el1egn
e2lem
e1lej
el1da
el1dr
el1år
el2tek
el1te
el2tin
el1ti
el2t1s
el1to
e1li
eli1e
el1g
el2sl2
e2l1s
el2stå
el2so
e1lod
e1l2ok
e2l1op
e1ly
elm2
e1læ
elæ2s
e1lø
elve2j
el1ve
elv3e1je
elv1r
el1vis
2elu
el1ud
elu2n
el1u1ni
e1luk
e1å
ena2
en1ald
en1an
en1art
en1ag
en1avi
en3eder
e1ne
ene1de
e2nel
en1e1le
1e2nerg
e2n1eta
1endem
e2nd
en1de
en3de1j
en1dre
en1å1e
2en1n
1eng1l
e2ng
en1gr
en1san
e2ns
en2s1af
1ensem
en1se
en1slæ
ensl2
ens1n
en1st
en1smu
ens3ken
en1ske
ens3kri
ensk2r
en1sku
en1skj
en1spe
en1su
2eno
en1ol
en1om
en1ya
en1kn2
en1kr
ence1s
en1c
e1næ
e1nø1re
en1øj
e2n1ud
en1un
2era
e1r2a.
er1a2be
er1ad1v
e1ra2n1b
e1ra1ne
er1a2ng
e1rat
e1ras
e1rao
e1ram
er1ak
e1ra1c
e1rap
er1a2f.
er1a2ft
e1r1au
e1re
ere2la
er1e1le
e2r1eta
2e1r2et1n
2erej
er1da
erden2
er1de
e1råd
2ert
er3t2s.
er2ts
e1ri
e2r1ib
e2r1i2ns
er3igen
eri1ge
er1i1mo
e3rif
er1sl2
ers1m
er1sk
er1sc
er1sp
e1r2o.
e1ro1e
e1rol
er1or
e1r2o1i
e1rog
e1ros
er1om
e1r2ok
er1o2p.
er1op1t
er1op1p
er1ov
er1k
e1ræ
e1rø
erø2v
e1rub
er1u2d
er1ur
er1ug
e1rus
e1rum
e1rup1
erjordi3ske
er1j
erjor1di2
e1t2a.
e1t1ad
e1tal
e1tar
e1ta1s
e1t1av
2e1te
e1tå
2et1n
2e1tr
et1res
e1ti.
e1ti1e
et2se
e2ts
ets1l2
et1ska
ets1p
e1to
et1op
e1ty
etydnin1g3e
e1tyd
etydnin2
etyd1n
etyd3ni
etydni2ng
et1ha
et1ho
e1tæ
e1tø
et1v
e1tu
et1u2n
e3tur
e1tj
ei2d
e1i2nd
e1ink
e1i2n1f
e1im
2e1ga
e2ge2ns
e1ge
e1gla
e1glæ
e1gr
egi1e
e1gi
e1gu
e1sa
e2s1ar
e2s1af
e3sel
e1se
e2s1ers
es1em
e2s1eva
ese1v
2esl2
es1li
e2s1år
es2na
est3ram
e1strø
e1sto
e1sty
e2stun
e2s1il
e1si
essel3a2
e2s1s
es1se
e1sy
es1ha
es1m
e1sk
e3skå
e3skø
e2s1kv
e1sc
es1pl
espi2s3t
e1spi
e1s2fæ
es1f
e3sø
e1su2
e1sj
e1o
eo1re
eo1ri.
eor2ge
eo1ro
e2o1k
ey2
e1yd
ey3l
ey3t
e1h
e2mad
e1ma
em1adr
em1ad1s
e2m1a2m
e3men
e1me
e3met
em1e1ta
em1eg
e2m1ef
e1må
em1år
em1tv
em1sk
ems1v
e2m1ov
e1mo
e1my
em1ø2s
e1mu
e1ka
e1ka1p
e1kl
e1kå
ek1n2
e1kr
ekti3er
ek1ti
e1ki
eks1k
1eks1p
e1ko
e1ko2m
e1ky
e1kæ
e1kø
e1kv
e1ku
e1kj
e1c
e2ca
e1pa
e1pe
e1pl
e1pr
e1psy
e1po
e1py
ep2h
e1pæ
e1pu
epu1b
e1fl
e1fr
efri1
e2f1t
e1fo
e1fø
e1æ2
eæn1
e1ø2
e2vad
e1ve
eve3st
e1ves
e1vå
ev1r
e1vi
1e2vig
ev1sp
e2vs
e1vo
e1væ
e1vø
e1vu
2e1ud
e1ul
e1un1
eu1te
eu1tr
eu1ti
e1um2
e1up
eufo1
eu2f
e1ja
e1jel
ej1sa
e2js
e1jo
e1ju1
e1xi1
e1zo
e1q
1d2a.
1da1e
2d1ad
da1l1a
d1ald
da1lu
1dan1n
d1a2n1g
d1a2r1b
d1arv2
d1at1l
da1to
da1i1
1dag
da2ger
da1ge
da2g1i
da2s
da3sk
1dak
1dap
2d1af
da1v
d1au
2d1b
d1be1
dbe3ns
1de
de1ar
de1e2
de1d
de1lan
de1le
dels1k
de2l1s
del2s3po
de1lov
del1v
d2e1lu
de1na2
2d1endt
de2nd
de2ni
den3sv
de2ns
de1rad
d2era
de1ral
de2rel
de1re
de3res
de1rå
de2r3i2nd
de1ri
der1g
der2sp
de1r2o1b
de1ta
de1ti
de1i
de1gy
de1sle
d2esl2
de1sta
de1str
de1sti
de1stj
de1sh
de1sp
des1v
de2op1l
de1o
de3mo
de1k1n2
de3c
de1p
de1v
2dej
d1d2
d3de
d3di
d1l
1dåb
d1ån
då1re
1dås
d1n
d3ni
1dra
d3rede1d
dre3de
d3reder
3drede2t.
d4redet
d1red1g
d1red1f
1dre1å
d1re2t1t
2d1reg
d1re1se
d1rest
1dre1o
d1rek
1dre1c
1drep
2drig
d1ri2v1n
d1rol
1drog
d1rør
1drøv
d1ru2l
d1ta
d2t1ar
d1te
d1tr
d1ti
dt1sl2
d2ts
dt1st
dt1sk
d1to
d1ty
dt1h
d1tæ
d1tø
dt1v
d1tu
1di
di1an
di2ar
di1e1d
di1er
di2de
2d1i2nd
3di2ng
din1gr
2d1ir1l2
di2ta
di1g1r
di1st
di3ol
di1o
di2os
di3om
di2op2
2dim
di1ko
di1p
d1g
dgui3
ds1a2nd
ds1a2n1s
ds1ar
ds1ak
d2s1af
d3set
d1se
d2sem
d2s1ef
d2se1v
d2sej
ds1lan
dsl2
d1slet
d1slå
d1slid
ds1lo
ds1lø
ds1ån
d2s1år
ds1na
ds1næ
d1snu
ds3ta2l.
ds1tro
d1strø
ds3ti2l1s
d1stæ
d1stu
d2s1tj
d2s1il
d1si
d2s1is
ds3ob
d1sol
ds1or
d1somt
ds1op
ds1of
ds1ov
ds1y2d
ds1h
ds1må
ds1mø
d1skal
ds1kan
d2sken
d1ske
ds3ke2nd
d2s1kl
d2s1kn2
d2s1kor
d1sky
d1skø
ds1c
ds1pen
d1spek
ds1pl
d1spor
d3sæ
ds1vi
ds1vo
ds1væ
ds1vu
ds1ur
ds1u2g
1d2o.
1d2ob1
1do1e
1don
dor1t
do1ri
1dos
1dom
2d1om1r
1d2ok
do1ven
1dy
d1ynk
dy1s
d1h
d1m
d1k
d1c
d1p
d1f
dfran1
1dæ
2d1æ2d
2d1æg
1dør
2d1ø2s
dø1j
d1v
d3vi
1du
du1esp
2d1ud1
2dun
dund1r
du2nd
du1r
du1s
d1ja
d1je
d1jo
d1w
2l.
la1bo
lad1r
2lad1g
la3ne
l1a2n1h
1la1te
la2t1r
la1tø
la2tu
lais1
1lag1d
l1ag1ti
la1gu
l1a2si
la1ka
la1kr
la1kv
l1af
lav1a
la1vi
l1b
1l2e.
le1ar
le1e2
1led
led1s
1lel
le1le
le1lo
1le2n.
le1na2
2l1ener
le1ne
len1sl2
le2ns
le1rad
l2era
le1ran
3lerd
le2r3i2nd
le1ri
3ler1p
le1ru
ler1un
le1ta
le1ti
1le1i
le1go
les1n
le1sta
le1sti
le2s1i
le1so
les1h
les1v
le3mad
le1ma
lem2si
le2m1o1s2
le1mo
1lep
le1pi
1lef
le1va
le1je
l1dat
l3d2e.
l1de
ld1ran
l1dra
l3drig
ld2se
ld1sta
lds1ti
ld3s1tj
lds2m
ld1s1me
ld1ska
ld1skå
ld1s1k2r
ld1skæ
ld2søe
ld1sø
ld1or
ld1op
l1l
lle2sk
lli1e
lli2t1
l1n
2l1r
l1ta
lta1t1o
l2t1af
l1te
l1tå
lt1rad
l1tri
lt1rol
l1træ
l1ti
lt1i2nd
lt1sp
l2ts
l1tog
lt1om
l1ty
lt1h
lt2kl
l2t1k2
l1tæ
lt1v
l1tu
l2t1ud
li1al
li1an
li2a1ti
li1at
li1a2s.
li1e2r.
li1li2
li2ne1o
li1ne
lin3dre
li2nd
lin2g2s1
li2ng
li1tr
li2gar
li1ga
li1sa
l1iso
lio2ns2
li1o
lion2
li3ma
li1ko
li3kken
lik1k
li1kv
1li1ku
li1c
l1gla
lg1re
lg1ry
l1grø
l1gru
lgi2e
l1gi
lg3se
l2gs
lgs1t
lgs1k
l1go
2l1s
ls1a2n1s
ls1a2t1t
l1sat
l2s1af
l2sel
l1se
ls1ele
lses1
l2slagn
lsl2
ls1lo
l2s1læ
l2s1år
l2sn
ls1na
ls1næ
l3sta
ls1i2nd
l1si
l3s1ov
l2sh
l3sha
l2s1m
ls2mag
ls1ma
ls2me
l2s1kam
l2sko
l2skæ
l2s1kv
l2sc
ls1pa
ls1pe
l2s1pl
l2s1pr
l2s1f
lsø2l
l1sø
l2sv
l3sva
l3svi
ls1væ
l2su
l2sj
lo1da
lodi2g
lo1di
lo1re
l1ord
3lo1ri
lo2g1r
lo1st
2lop
1lof
1lo2v.
lo1va
lo1ve
l2o2væ
1lou
ly1a
ly1d1a2
lyd1r
ly2nd1
ly2ni
ly1tr
ly2sk
l1h
l2m1af
l1ma
l1må
lm1i2ns
l1mi
l3mis
lm2s1i
l1ka
l1kap1
l1ke
l1kl
l1kå
l1kr
l1ki
lk1sh
l1ko
l1kæ
l1kø
l1kv
l1ku
l1c
l1pa
l1pe
l1pl
l1pr
l1pi
l1po
lp2h
l1pæ
l1f
l2fle
l2f1f
2læt
2lø.
1løb
lø1er
1løg
lø2g1s
1løs
lø1ve
lø1je
l1val
l1var
l1ve
lv1re
lv1ri
l1vid
l1vil
l2v1s
l2v1ov
l1væ
lu1e2n
lu1r
lu1ta
lu1th
lu1st
lu1kr
1luj
l1j
l1w
åb1l
1å1br
å2b2s1
å1bæ
å1e
åe1li4
å1da
åd1sl2
å1le
å1li
ål1g
ål2s1te
å2l1s
ål3sc
ål2sp
å1lø
ål1v
ån2da
å2nd
ånd1st
ånd2si
ånd1sk
ån1so
å2ns
å1r2e.
å1red
å1rer
år2s
år3sle
årsl2
år1s1t
år3sæ
år1s1v
å1ru
å1ta
å1tr
å1ti
å1tæ
å1tu
å1gr
å1st
å1so
ås1ka
å1o2
å1h
å1m
å1k
å1p
å1f
å1ø
å1v
å1z
2n.
1n2a.
na1b
na2bl
1nad
na2lin
na1li
na1na
n1a2nd
2n1a2n1g
n1a2r1b
na3te
na2tr
na1sa
na2me
nak1s
1nac
2navl
nau1
2n1b
n3be
1ne
ne1a
ne1e2
ned1sk
ne1la
ne1le
ne1na2
n2e1ra
ne1rå
ne2r3i2nd
ne1ri
2nerg
ne1ro
ne1ry
2neta
ne1ti
ne2to
ne3tu
ne1i
ne1st
ne1so
ne1sp
ne1sv
ne2org
ne1o
ne2op1l
ne2mi
nem1s
ne1mø
ne1ke
ne1v
neu1r
ne1je
2nd
n1da
n3dal
nde1la
n1de
n2dener
nde1ne
nd1å
n3dran
n1dra
nd1ram
n2d1rest
nd1rik
n1dro
nd1ry
n2d1rø
nd1tj
n2d1im
n1di
nd1så
nd1sta
nd1sti
nd1sy
nds2me
nd1s1c
nd1spa
nd1spr
nd2s1ø
nds1v
n1dol
nd1or
nd1og
nd1op
nd1of
n1dø
n2d1un
n1du
2n1l
nli2n2e.
nli1ne
n1åb
n1n
nnin2gs3
n1ni
nni2ng
n1r
2nt
n1ta
n2ta2ns
n1te
nt1e2n1h
n1t2er1a
n1tr
nt2ra
nt1rud
n1ti
n2ti1b2
n2t3in1st
nti2ns
n2ti1se
nt1sn
n2ts
nt1sk
nt1sp
n1to
n2t1op
n1ty
nt1c
n1tæ
n1tø
nt1v
n1tu
n2t1ud
1ni
ni1a
ni1b2
3nie
ni1e2l.
2n1i2nd
n1i2ns
ni1gr
ni3ol
ni1o
nik2r
nik2s
ni1ko
ni2v1s
n1i1vo
2ng
n1glo
ng1læ
ng1lø
ng1lu
n2gå.
n1gå
ng1rer
n1gri
ng1ta
ng1to
ng1sy
n2gs
ng2sk
n1go
n2g1op
n1gy
ng1ær
n1gæ
ng1ud
2ns
n1s2a.
ns1ab
ns1ar
ns1ak
nse1i
n1se
ns1lat
nsl2
ns2lag
n1slå
ns1lo
ns1ly
n1slu
ns1ny
n2s1tro
n1sti
ns1til
n2s1tim
n2s1im
n1si
n1sol
ns1org
ns1op
n1sov
n1sy
ns1ha
n1s2mel
ns1me
ns1mø
n1ska
n2s1kam
n2sk1ej
n1ske
n2s1kl
n1skra
nsk2r
n2s1kor
nsky2
nskys1
ns1kur
ns1pa
n1sple
ns1pu
n1sva
ns1ve
n2s1vi
n1svæ
1n2o.
1nod
no2li
no1ra
no1re
n1ogt
no1st
n1op
2n3op1l
1nov
nyd2
ny1d1a2
ny1l
ny1se1
ny1sl2
ny1st
ny1sk
ny1o
2n1h
2n1m
n3ma
nmu1
n1ka
n1ke
n1kla
nk1li
nk1ly
n1kå
nk1rå
nk3ri2gs
nk1rø
n1ki
nk1st
nk1s1g
nk1so
n1ko
n2k2o.
n1kæ
n1kø
nk1v
n1ku
n1c
n3ca
n1cy1
n1p
2n1f
næn1
næ1ru
næ1sk
n1øe
1nø2r.
1nørm
n1ørk
1nørv2
1nøg
2nø2s
2n1øk
2n1v
n3vi
1nu.
nu1a
nub1
1nu3e
2nud
nu1da
nu1i
nu1h
1num
1nu3k
nu1v
n1j
n1z
2r.
ra2ben
ra1be
1rabl
1ra1e
ra1da
1rad1f
ra2lo
ral1v
r1an1dr
ra2nd
r1a2n1l
r1an1ta
ra2nt
r1angr
ra2ng
2ra2n1m
r1a2r1b
r1ar3r
r1art
r1arg
r1arm
r1arv2
ra1to
ra1ty
ra1tø
rai2
ra1in
ra1is
ra1sa
ra1so
ra1os
ra2mo
